District of Columbia statutes.
23-902

Hearing; commitment; discharge.

If an arrest is made in the District of Columbia by an officer of another State in accordance with the provisions of section 23-901 , he shall without unnecessary delay take the person arrested before a judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, who shall conduct a hearing for the purpose of determining the lawfulness of the arrest. If the judge determines that the arrest was lawful, he shall order the release or detention of the person arrested, pursuant to section 23-702 , to await for a reasonable time a requisition from the Governor of the State demanding the extradition of the person arrested. If the judge determines that the arrest was unlawful he shall order the person discharged.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
1981 Ed., § 23-902.
1973 Ed., § 23-902.